Louisiana, session 2026, HB712.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:412.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§412.4. Homelessness exemption; driver's licenses
A.(1) The department shall not charge a fee for issuing, renewing, or
providing a duplicate of any Class "E" driver's license for a person who is homeless.
The person shall demonstrate homelessness by presenting a letter, at the time of
application, attesting to his homelessness from either of the following entities:
(a) An established homeless shelter.
(b) An outreach or supportive service provider.
(c) A healthcare provider.
(d) A school homeless liaison staffer.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-740 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 712
(e) A domestic violence service provider.
(2) For the purposes of this Section, the term "homeless" or "homelessness"
shall include a person living at or below one hundred percent of the federal poverty
line or as defined in 42 U.S.C. 11302.
B. The waiver of fees shall include the issuance, renewal, or duplicate of any
Class "E" driver's license.
C. The department shall waive a fee that would otherwise be charged for the
issuance of any Class "E" drivers license, if the individual confirms he is not in
violation of any provision contained in R.S. 32:414.
D. The provisions of this Section shall apply only to residents of the state of
Louisiana.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1321.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1321.3. Homelessness exemption; state identification cards
A.(1) The department shall not charge a fee for issuing, renewing, or
providing a duplicate of any state identification card for a person who is homeless.
The person shall demonstrate homelessness by presenting a letter, at the time of
application, attesting to his homelessness from either of the following entities:
(a) An established homeless shelter.
(b) An outreach or supportive service provider.
(c) A healthcare provider.
(d) A school homeless liaison staffer.
(e) A domestic violence service provider.
(2) For the purposes of this Section, the term "homeless" or "homelessness"
shall include a person living at or below one hundred percent of the federal poverty
line or as defined in 42 U.S.C. 11302.
B. The waiver of fees shall include the issuance, renewal, or duplicate of any
state identification card.
C. The provisions of this Section shall apply only to residents of the state of
Louisiana.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-740 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 712